Missouri, session 2026, HB2782.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 105.684 and 169.540, RSMo, are repealed and three new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 105.684, 169.540, and 169.542, to read as
follows:
105.684. 1. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no plan shall adopt or
implement any additional benefit increase, supplement, enhancement, lump sum benefit
payments to participants, or cost-of-living adjustment beyond current plan provisions in effect
prior to August 28, 2007, which would, in aggregate with any other proposed plan provisions,
increase the plan's actuarial accrued liability when valued by an actuary using the same
methods and assumptions as used in the most recent periodic valuation, unless the plan's
actuary determines that the funded ratio of the most recent periodic actuarial valuation and
prior to such adoption or implementation is at least eighty percent and will not be less than
seventy-five percent after such adoption or implementation, except for the system governed
by sections 169.410 to 169.542, which may administer a one-time supplemental payment
as set forth in section 169.542, subject to state appropriations. Methods and assumptions
used in valuing such proposed change may be modified if the nature is such that alternative
assumptions are clearly warranted.
2. The unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities associated with benefit changes
described in this section shall be amortized over a period not to exceed twenty years for
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2782 2
purposes of determining the contributions associated with the adoption or implementation of
any such benefit increase, supplement, or enhancement.
3. Any plan with a funded ratio below sixty percent shall have the actuary prepare an
accelerated contribution schedule based on a descending amortization period for inclusion in
the actuarial valuation.
4. Nothing in this section shall apply to any plan established under chapter 70 or
chapter 476.
5. Nothing in this section shall prevent a plan from adopting and implementing any
provision necessary to maintain a plan's status as a qualified trust pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
Section 401(a).
169.540. The state of Missouri shall contribute no funds directly or indirectly to
finance the plan to pay pension benefits by appropriation bills or otherwise, except:
(1) Those funds which the district may receive from time to time under a law or laws
providing for a general apportionment of school moneys throughout all the state [and except];
(2) Employer contributions for members employed by the board of regents which
shall be made by the state of Missouri; and
(3) State funds appropriated for a one-time supplemental payment as set forth in
section 169.542.
169.542. 1. The board of trustees shall administer and distribute a one-time
supplemental payment of a pension benefit, as defined in section 169.410, to a retired
member or beneficiary as provided in this section.
2. Subject to appropriations, the supplemental payment shall be payable no later
than September 30, 2027, and to the extent practicable, on a date or dates that coincide
with the regular pension benefit payable to each retired member or beneficiary.
3. The amount of the supplemental payment shall be equal to the lesser of:
(1) The gross amount of the regular pension benefit to which the retired member
or beneficiary is otherwise entitled for the calendar month immediately prior to the
calendar month in which the supplemental payment is issued; or
(2) Two thousand dollars.
4. The board of trustees shall make applicable tax withholding and any other
legally required deductions before disbursing the supplementary payment.
5. A supplementary payment under this section shall be in addition to, and not in
lieu of, a regular monthly pension benefit to which the eligible retired member or
beneficiary is otherwise entitled.
6. In order to be eligible for a supplemental payment, a person shall be, for the
calendar month immediately prior to the calendar month in which the board of trustees

HB 2782 3
issues the one-time supplemental payment, eligible to receive a standard retirement
pension benefit under sections 169.410 to 169.542.
7. The board of trustees shall determine the eligibility for, and the amount and
timing of, a supplemental payment and the manner in which the payment shall be made.
8. The state shall appropriate to the retirement system governed by sections
169.410 to 169.542 an amount equal to the cost of the one-time supplemental payment
required by this section. If the state does not transfer the appropriated amount
described by this subsection, the board of trustees shall not issue the one-time
supplemental payment required by this section.
✔